Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-260
Conduct of the meeting.

(MBCA 7.08) (a) At each
meeting of shareholders, a chairperson shall preside. The chairperson shall
be appointed as provided in the bylaws or, in the absence of such provision,
by the board.

(b) The chairperson, unless
the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, shall determine
the order of business and shall have the authority to establish rules for
the conduct of the meeting.

(c)
Any rules adopted for, and the conduct of, the meeting shall be fair to shareholders.

(d) The chairperson of the
meeting shall announce at the meeting when the polls close for each matter
voted upon. If no announcement is made, the polls shall be deemed to have
closed upon the final adjournment of the meeting. After the polls close, no
ballots, proxies, or votes nor any revocations or changes thereto may be accepted.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 60.
January 1, 2016